Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.050

Mental incapacity as bar to proceedings.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

No incompetent person shall be tried, convicted, or sentenced for the commission of an offense so long as such incapacity continues.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 198 s 5; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 5.]